Nevada, session 83, AB507.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 353.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
353.220 1. The head of any department, institution or agency
of the Executive Department of the State Government, whenever he
or she deems it necessary because of changed conditions, may
request the revision of the work program of his or her department,
institution or agency at any time during the fiscal year, and submit
the proposed revised work program to the Governor through the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Chief with a request for revision of the [allotments] work program
for the remainder of that fiscal year.
2. Every request for revision must be submitted to the Chief on
the form and with supporting information as the Chief prescribes.
3. Before encumbering any appropriated or authorized money,
every request for revision must be approved or disapproved in
writing by the Governor or the Chief, if the Governor has by written
instrument delegated this authority to the Chief.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, whenever a
request for the revision of a work program of a department,
institution or agency :
(a) Proposes a revision in one or more of the categories of
expense within the work program in [an] a total amount of more
than $75,000 [would,] ; and
(b) Would, when considered with all other changes in
[allotments for] that work program made pursuant to subsections 1,
2 and 3 and NRS 353.215, increase or decrease by 20 percent or
$350,000, whichever is less, the expenditure level approved by the
Legislature for any of the [allotments] categories of expense within
the work program,
 the request must be approved as provided in subsection 5 before
any appropriated or authorized money may be encumbered for the
revision. A proposed revision of a work program must not be
divided into separate requests to avoid the requirements of this
subsection.
5. If a request for the revision of a work program requires
additional approval as provided in subsection 4 and:
(a) Is necessary because of an emergency as defined in NRS
353.263 or for the protection of life or property, the Governor shall
take reasonable and proper action to approve it and shall report the
action, and his or her reasons for determining that immediate action
was necessary, to the Interim Finance Committee at its first meeting
after the action is taken. Action by the Governor pursuant to this
paragraph constitutes approval of the revision, and other provisions
of this chapter requiring approval before encumbering money for the
revision do not apply.
(b) The Governor determines that the revision is necessary and
requires expeditious action, he or she may certify that the request
requires expeditious action by the Interim Finance Committee.
Whenever the Governor so certifies, the Interim Finance Committee
has 15 days after the request is submitted to its Secretary within
which to consider the revision. Any request for revision which is not
considered within the 15-day period shall be deemed approved.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(c) Does not qualify pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b), it must be
submitted to the Interim Finance Committee. Except as otherwise
provided in NRS 353.3375, the Interim Finance Committee has 45
days after the request is submitted to its Secretary within which to
consider the revision. Any request which is not considered within
the 45-day period shall be deemed approved.
6. The Secretary shall place each request submitted pursuant to
paragraph (b) or (c) of subsection 5 on the agenda of the next
meeting of the Interim Finance Committee.
7. In acting upon a proposed revision of a work program, the
Interim Finance Committee shall consider, among other things:
(a) The need for the proposed revision; and
(b) The intent of the Legislature in approving the budget for the
present biennium and originally enacting the statutes which the
work program is designed to effectuate.
8. The provisions of subsection 4 do not apply to any request
for the revision of a work program which is required:
(a) As a result of the acceptance of a gift or grant of property or
services pursuant to subsection 5 of NRS 353.335; or
(b) To carry forward to a fiscal year, without a change in
purpose, the unexpended balance of any money authorized for
expenditure in the immediately preceding fiscal year.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)